src/fst/morphology/incoming/bla_phon2.regex
! 23.    V17h    ->    V17V1h
! Vowel Epenthesis
! note: In place of this rule, some speakers have the following rule:
! 7 -> 0 / _ h
define vowelEpenthesis [ 
    a 7 -> [ a 7 a | a ] ,
    á 7 -> [ á 7 á | á ] ,
    i 7 -> [ i 7 i | i ] ,
    í 7 -> [ í 7 í | í ] ,
    o 7 -> [ o 7 o | o ] ,
    ó 7 -> [ ó 7 ó | ó ] || _ h ] ;

! 24.    sssC    ->    ssC
! sss-Shortening
define sssShortening s -> 0 || _ s s [ stops | glides ] ;

! 25.
! Accent Spread
define accentSpread [
    a -> á ,
    i -> í ,
    o -> ó || accentedVowels Bx _ ] ;

! Needed to ADD a simple rule which allows for either a shortening of vowels (or not) after long consonants
! REMEMBER THISSS

define vowelOption [ vowels -> 0 || Cgem Bx _ Vowel ] ;

! 26.    - -> 0
! Break-Delete
! Remove the morpheme delimiter symbol. Note that \"-" is the term
! complement of "-", i.e., the set of single-symbol strings that does
! not contain the hyphen. This formulation is superior to "-" -> 0 since
! it does not introduce so much ambiguity during parsing.
!define breakDelete Bx -> 0 || [ .!. | \Bx ] _ \Bx ;
!define breakDelete Bx -> 0 ;
define deep2surfRule [ Bx -> 0 ,, 7 -> ' ,, n2 -> n ,, m2 -> m ] ; 

! define Raccent [
  !  á -> a,
   ! í -> i,
   ! ó -> o,
   ! a -> á,
   ! í -> i,
   ! ó -> o
! ] ;



! The relaxer series is a set of rules which allow for the phonological model to accomodate for some common 
! spelling variations present in the corpus. This is meant to assist with morpheme segmentation. 


! Phonology FST: ordered rewrite rules = ordered composition of FSTs
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!
! Rules apply for maximal ``feeding'' and minimal ``bleeding'' except that
! coalescence bleeds desyllabification, presibilation, and semivowel loss;
! i-absorption bleeds desyllabification, and gemination bleeds s-insertion.
! Desyllabification bleeds accent spread, but does not bleed nor feed any other
! rules (Frantz 1991, p. 155).

define phonology [ ! lexical phonological rules
    irregularBreaking .o.
    semivowelAlternation .o.
    nasalInitialVerbs .o.
    imperativeInitialVowelElision .o.
    codafication .o.
    stopStopEpenthesis .o.
    becomeO .o.
    becomeA .o.
    nasalLoss .o.
    variableLengthVowels .o.
    3mm .o.
    DTPVowelElision .o.
    nonPermanentConsonants .o.
    diphthongization .o.
    initialChangeAY .o.
    initialChangeII .o.
    yiLoss .o.
    inverseClipping .o.
    vowelOption .o.
    

    ! (general) phonological rules
    coalescence .o. 
    semivowelLoss .o. 
    gemination .o. 
    sConnection .o. 
    yReduction .o. 
    breaking .o. 
    oReplacement .o. 
    ihLoss .o. 
    presibilation .o. 
    sssShortening .o. 
    semivowelDrop .o. 
    vowelShortening .o. 
    tAffrication .o. 
    postsibilation .o. 
    iAbsorption .o.
    desyllabification .o. 
    glottalMetathesis .o. 
    vowelEpenthesis .o. 
    glottalReduction .o. 
    glottalLoss .o. 
    glottalAssimilation .o. 
    accentSpread .o. 
    deep2surfRule .o.
    iLoss
   
    ] ;
